Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Railroads

§§ 1-26-201 through 1-26-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

Editor's notes. —

This article derived from Laws 1888, ch. 56, §§ 1, 2, 22, 24 and 31 through 36.